Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 3 CHILD CARE LICENSING
26.5-5-315. Staffing during emergency circumstances - definitions.

During an emergency circumstance, a child care center may permit an employee who has successfully completed criminal background check requirements but is not a qualified caregiver to supervise children for not more than two hours while the child care center secures a qualified caregiver.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a large child care center, as defined by department rule, or a child care center that operates on the property of a school district, district charter school, or institute charter school, may permit an employee of the child care center or an employee of the school district, district charter school, or institute charter school who has successfully completed criminal background check requirements but is not a qualified caregiver to supervise children for an amount of time that is reasonably necessary to address an emergency circumstance.

During an emergency circumstance, a child care center shall maintain the staff-to-child ratio required by rule of the executive director.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "emergency circumstance" includes, but is not limited to, illness, death, accident, law enforcement action, road closure, hazardous weather, emergency bodily function, child elopement, or providing emergency attention or care to a child.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 755, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-106.2 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-316. Investigations and inspections - local authority - reports - rules.

The department shall investigate and pass on each original application for a license, each application for a permanent or time-limited license following the issuance of a probationary or provisional license, and each application for renewal, to operate a facility or an agency prior to granting the license or renewal. As part of the investigation, the department shall require each individual, including but not limited to the applicant, any owner, employee, newly hired employee, licensee, and any adult who is eighteen years of age and older who resides in the licensed facility to obtain a fingerprint-based criminal history record check by reviewing any record that is used to assist the department in ascertaining whether the person being investigated has been convicted of any of the criminal offenses specified in section 26.5-5-309 (4) or any other felony. The executive director shall promulgate rules that define and identify what the criminal history record check entails.

Rules promulgated by the executive director pursuant to this subsection (1)(a)(I) must allow an exemption from the fingerprint-based criminal history record check and the check of the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the state department of human services for those out-of-state employees working in Colorado at a children's resident camp in a temporary capacity for a camp that is in operation for fewer than ninety days. Each person so exempted from fingerprinting and the check of the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the state department of human services shall sign a statement that affirmatively states that the person has not been convicted of any charge of child abuse, unlawful sexual offense, or any felony. Prospective employers of exempted persons shall conduct reference checks of the prospective employees in order to verify previous work history and shall conduct personal interviews with each prospective employee.

Rules promulgated by the executive director pursuant to this subsection (1)(a)(I) must require the fingerprint-based criminal history record check in all circumstances, other than those identified in subsection (1)(a)(I)(B) or (1)(a)(I)(D) of this section, to include a fingerprint-based criminal history record check utilizing the records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation and, for any new owner, new applicant, newly hired employee, new licensee, or individual who begins residing in the licensed facility. As part of the investigation, the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the state department of human services must be accessed to determine whether the owner, applicant, employee, newly hired employee, licensee, or individual who resides in the licensed facility being investigated has been found to be responsible in a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect. Information is made available pursuant to section 19-1-307 (2)(j) and rules promulgated by the state board of human services pursuant to section 19-3-313.5 (4). Except as provided in subsection (1)(a)(I)(D) of this section, any change in ownership of a licensed facility or the addition of a new resident adult or newly hired employee to the licensed facility requires a new investigation as provided in this section.

When two or more individually licensed facilities are wholly owned, operated, and controlled by a common ownership group or school district, a fingerprint-based criminal history record check and a check of the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the state department of human services, completed for one of the licensed facilities of the common ownership group or school district pursuant to this section for any individual for whom such a check is required under this part 3 may satisfy the record check requirement for any other licensed facility under the same common ownership group or school district. A new fingerprint-based criminal history record check or new check of the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the state department of human services is not required of such an individual if the common ownership group or school district maintains a central records management system for employees of all its licensed facilities; takes action as required pursuant to section 26.5-5-309 when informed of the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check or check of the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the state department of human services that requires action pursuant to this part 3; and informs the department whenever an additional licensed facility comes under or is no longer under its ownership or control.

The executive director shall promulgate rules to implement this subsection (1)(a)(I).

A comparison search on the ICON system at the state judicial department with the name and date of birth information and any other available source of criminal history information that the department determines is appropriate for each circumstance in which the fingerprint check conducted by the Colorado bureau of investigation either does not confirm a criminal history or confirms a criminal history, in order to determine the crime or crimes for which the person was arrested or convicted and the disposition thereof;

Any other recognized database, if any, that is accessible on a statewide basis as set forth by department rules; and

When the results of an investigation performed pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section or this subsection (1)(a)(II) reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d).

When the department is able to certify that the applicant or licensee is competent and will operate adequate facilities to care for children under the requirements of this part 3 and that standards are being met and will be complied with, it shall issue the license for which applied. The department shall inspect or cause to be inspected the facilities to be operated by an applicant for an original license before the license is granted and shall thereafter inspect or cause to be inspected the facilities of all licensees that, during the period of licensure, have been found to be the subject of complaints or to be out of compliance with the standards set forth in section 26.5-5-314 and department rules or that otherwise appear to be placing children at risk. The department may make such other inspections as it deems necessary to ensure that the requirements of this part 3 are being met and that the health, safety, and welfare of the children being placed are protected.

The executive director shall adopt rules concerning the on-site public availability of the most recent inspection report results of child care center facilities and family child care home facilities, when requested. The executive director shall also adopt rules concerning a requirement that all facilities licensed under this part 3 post their licenses and information regarding the procedures for filing a complaint under this part 3 directly with the department, which rules must require that each such facility display its license and complaint procedures in a prominent and conspicuous location at all times during operational hours of the facility.

If, as a result of an inspection of a licensed child care center facility or family child care home facility, the department determines that there were no serious violations of any of the standards prescribed and published by the department or any of the provisions of this part 3, within twenty days after completing the inspection the department shall send a written notice to the facility indicating such fact. Within ten days after receipt of the written notice, the licensee shall provide a copy of the written notice to the parents and legal guardians of the children cared for at the child care center facility or family child care home facility.

When the department receives a serious complaint about a child care facility licensed pursuant to this part 3 alleging the immediate risk of health or safety of the children cared for in such facility, the department shall respond to the complaint and conduct an on-site investigation concerning the complaint within forty-eight hours after its receipt.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3)(a)(II) of this section, the department may authorize or contract with any county department, the county department of health, or any other publicly or privately operated organization that has a declared interest in children and experience working with children or on behalf of children to investigate and inspect the facilities applying for an original or renewal license or applying for a permanent license following the issuance of a probationary or provisional license under this part 3 and may accept reports on such investigations and inspections from such agencies or organizations as a basis for such licensing. When contracting for investigations and inspections, the department shall assure that the contractor is qualified by training and experience and has no conflict of interest with respect to the facilities to be inspected.
(3) (a) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3)(a)(II) of this section, the department may authorize or contract with any county department, the county department of health, or any other publicly or privately operated organization that has a declared interest in children and experience working with children or on behalf of children to investigate and inspect the facilities applying for an original or renewal license or applying for a permanent license following the issuance of a probationary or provisional license under this part 3 and may accept reports on such investigations and inspections from such agencies or organizations as a basis for such licensing. When contracting for investigations and inspections, the department shall assure that the contractor is qualified by training and experience and has no conflict of interest with respect to the facilities to be inspected.

The department shall not authorize or contract with any county department, the county department of health, or any other publicly or privately operated organization that has a declared interest in children and experience working with children or on behalf of children for investigations and inspections described in subsection (3)(a)(I) of this section of any facilities that provide twenty-four-hour care and are licensed pursuant to this part 3.

A city, county, or city and county may impose and enforce higher standards and requirements for facilities licensed under this part 3 than the standards and requirements specified under this part 3.

Every facility licensed under this part 3 shall keep and maintain such records as the department may prescribe pertaining to the admission, progress, health, and discharge of children under the care of the facility, and shall report relative thereto to the department whenever called for, upon forms prescribed by the department. The facility and the department shall keep all records regarding children and all facts learned about children and their relatives confidential.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 755, § 3, effective July 1; (1)(a)(II)(C) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 531, § 50, effective April 21.

26.5-5-317. Denial of license - suspension - revocation - probation - refusal to renew license - fines.

When an application for a license has been denied by the department, the department shall notify the applicant in writing of the denial by mailing a notice to the applicant at the address shown on the application. Any applicant who is aggrieved by the denial may pursue the remedy for review as provided in subsection (9) of this section if the applicant, within thirty days after receiving the notice, petitions the department to set a date and place for hearing, affording the applicant an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. All hearings on the denial of licenses shall be conducted in conformity with the provisions and procedures specified in article 4 of title 24, as in the case of the suspension and revocation of licenses.

The department may deny an application, or suspend, revoke, or make probationary the license of any facility regulated and licensed under this part 3 or assess a fine against the licensee pursuant to section 26.5-5-323 if the licensee, an affiliate of the licensee, a person employed by the licensee, or a person who resides with the licensee at the facility:

Is convicted of any felony, other than those offenses specified in section 26.5-5-309 (4), or child abuse, as specified in section 18-6-401, the record of conviction being conclusive evidence thereof, notwithstanding section 24-5-101; or have entered into a deferred judgment agreement or a deferred prosecution agreement to any felony, other than those offenses specified in section 26.5-5-309 (4) or child abuse, as specified in section 18-6-401; or should the department have a certified court order from another state indicating that the applicant, licensee, person employed by the licensee, or any person residing with the licensee has been convicted of a felony, other than those offenses specified in section 26.5-5-309 (4), under a law of any other state or the United States or has entered into a deferred judgment agreement or a deferred prosecution agreement in another state as to a felony, other than those offenses specified in section 26.5-5-309 (4); or

Is convicted of third degree assault, as described in section 18-3-204; any misdemeanor, the underlying factual basis of which has been found by the court on the record to include an act of domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3; the violation of a protection order, as described in section 18-6-803.5; any misdemeanor offense of child abuse as defined in section 18-6-401; or any misdemeanor offense in any other state, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of any one of the offenses described in this subsection (2)(b). As used in this subsection (2)(b), "convicted" has the same meaning as set forth in section 26.5-5-309 (4)(a)(II).

Is determined to be insane or mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction and, if a court enters, pursuant to part 3 or part 4 of article 14 of title 15, or section 27-65-109 (4) or 27-65-127, an order specifically finding that the mental incompetency or insanity is of such a degree that the licensee is incapable of operating a family child care home or child care center, the record of such determination and entry of such order being conclusive evidence thereof; or

Uses any controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), including retail marijuana, or consumes any alcoholic beverage during the operating hours of the facility or is under the influence of a controlled substance or alcoholic beverage during the operating hours of the facility; or

Is convicted of unlawful use of a controlled substance as specified in section 18-18-404; unlawful distribution, manufacturing, dispensing, sale, or possession of a controlled substance as specified in section 18-18-403.5 or 18-18-405; or unlawful offenses relating to marijuana or marijuana concentrate as specified in section 18-18-406; or

Consistently fails to maintain standards prescribed and published by the department; or

Furnishes or makes any misleading or any false statement or report to the department; or

Refuses to submit to the department any reports or refuses to make available to the department any records required by it in making investigation of the facility for licensing purposes; or

Fails or refuses to submit to an investigation or inspection by the department or to admit authorized representatives of the department at any reasonable time for the purpose of investigation or inspection; or

Fails to provide, maintain, equip, and keep in safe and sanitary condition premises established or used for child care pursuant to standards prescribed by the department of public health and environment and the department or by ordinances or regulations applicable to the location of such facility; or

Willfully or deliberately violates any of the provisions of this part 3 or any of the standards prescribed and published in department rule pursuant to this part 3; or

Fails to maintain financial resources adequate for the satisfactory care of children served in regard to upkeep of premises and provision for personal care, medical services, clothing, and other essentials in the proper care of children; or

Is charged with the commission of an act of child abuse or an unlawful sexual offense, as specified in section 18-3-411 (1), if:

Such individual has admitted committing the act or offense and the admission is documented or uncontroverted; or

The administrative law judge finds that such charge is supported by substantial evidence; or

Admits to an act of child abuse or if substantial evidence is found that the licensee, person employed by the licensee, or person who resides with the licensee in the licensed facility has committed an act of child abuse. As used in this subsection (2)(n), "child abuse" has the same meaning as that ascribed to the term "abuse" or "child abuse or neglect" in section 19-1-103 (1); or

Is the subject of a negative licensing action.

The department may deny an application to renew a license based on the grounds set forth in subsection (2) of this section. The denial is effective upon the expiration of the existing license. The existing license does not continue in effect even though the applicant for renewal files a request for hearing or appeal.

The department may deny an application for a child care facility license pursuant to this part 3 if the applicant is a relative affiliate of a licensee of a child care facility licensed pursuant to this part 3, which licensee is the subject of a previous negative licensing action or is the subject of a pending investigation by the department that may result in a negative licensing action.

The department shall deny an application for a license under the circumstances described in section 26.5-5-309 (4). The department shall revoke or suspend a license previously issued if:
(5) (a) (I) The department shall deny an application for a license under the circumstances described in section 26.5-5-309 (4). The department shall revoke or suspend a license previously issued if:

The licensee, person employed by the licensee, or person residing with the licensee is thereafter convicted or if it is later discovered that the licensee, person employed by the licensee, or person residing with the licensee had previously been convicted of any of the criminal offenses set forth in section 26.5-5-309 (4); or

The department has a certified court order from another state indicating that the licensee, person employed by the licensee, or person residing with the licensee is thereafter convicted of, or if it is later discovered that the licensee, person employed by the licensee, or person residing with the licensee had previously been convicted of a criminal offense under a law of any other state or of the United States that is similar to any of the criminal offenses set forth in section 26.5-5-309 (4); or

The licensee, an affiliate of the licensee, a person employed by the licensee, or a person who resides with the licensee at the facility has been determined to be insane or mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction and the court has entered pursuant to part 3 or part 4 of article 14 of title 15 or section 27-65-109 (4) or 27-65-127, an order specifically finding that the mental incompetency or insanity is of such a degree that the licensee is incapable of operating a family child care home or child care center, the record of the determination and entry of the order being conclusive evidence thereof.

As used in this subsection (5)(a), "convicted" means a conviction by a jury or by a court and includes a deferred judgment and sentence agreement, a deferred prosecution agreement, a deferred adjudication agreement, an adjudication, and a plea of guilty or nolo contendere.

A certified copy of the judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction of such conviction or deferred judgment and sentence agreement, deferred prosecution agreement, deferred adjudication agreement, or a certified court order from another state indicating such an agreement from another state is prima facie evidence of such conviction or agreement.

The department shall deny an application for an entity licensed under this part 3 and shall revoke the license of an entity licensed under this part 3 if the entity cultivates marijuana pursuant to the authority in section 16 of article XVIII of the state constitution.

The department may assess fines, pursuant to the provisions of section 26.5-5-323, against a licensee or a person employed by the licensee who willfully and deliberately or consistently violates the standards prescribed and published by the department or the provisions of this part 3.

The department shall determine the existence of convictions identified in this section according to the records of the Colorado bureau of investigation, the ICON system at the state judicial department, or any other source, as set forth in section 26.5-5-316 (1)(a)(II).

The department shall suspend or revoke a license only in conformity with the provisions and procedures specified in article 4 of title 24, and after a hearing thereon as provided in said article 4; except that an administrative law judge shall conduct all hearings under this part 3 and issue an initial decision. The executive director shall review the initial decision and issue the final decision of the department. A licensee is not entitled to a right to cure any of the charges described in subsection (2)(a), (2)(c), (2)(d), or (2)(m)(I) of this section. A hearing does not prevent or delay any injunctive proceedings instituted under the provisions of section 26.5-5-320.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 760, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-108 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-318. Notice of negative licensing action - filing of complaints.

When a child care center facility or family child care home facility licensed pursuant to this part 3 has been notified by the department of a negative licensing action or the imposition of a fine pursuant to section 26.5-5-317 (2) and (7), it shall, within ten days after receipt of the notice, provide the department with the names and mailing addresses of the parents or legal guardians of each child cared for at the child care center facility or family child care home facility. The department shall maintain the confidentiality of the names and mailing addresses provided to it pursuant to this subsection (1).

Within twenty days after receipt of the names and addresses of parents and legal guardians pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, the department shall send a written notice to each parent or legal guardian identifying the negative licensing action or the fine imposed and providing a description of the basis for the action as it relates to the impact on the health, safety, and welfare of the children in the care of the facility. The department shall send the notice to the parents and legal guardians by first-class mail.

The executive director shall promulgate rules concerning the assessment of a fine against a licensee that is equal to the direct and indirect costs associated with the mailing of the notice described in subsection (1)(b) of this section against the facility.

This subsection (1) does not preclude the department or a county department of human or social services from notifying parents of serious violations of any of the standards prescribed and published by the department or any of the provisions of this part 3 that could impact the health, safety, or welfare of a child cared for at the facility or home.

The executive director shall promulgate rules requiring child care center facilities and family child care home facilities to provide written notice to the parents and legal guardians of the children cared for in such facilities of the procedures by which to file a complaint against the facility or an employee of the facility with the department. The rules must specify the information the notice must contain, but must require that the notice include the current mailing address and telephone number of the appropriate division within the department.

The department shall track and record complaints made to the department that are brought against family child care homes and shall identify which complaints were brought against licensed family child care homes, unlicensed family child care homes, or legally exempt family child care homes.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 765, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-108.5 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-319. Institutes.

The department is authorized to hold institutes and programs for licensees under this part 3 to assist in the improvement of standards and practices of facilities operated and maintained by licensees and in the more efficient and practical administration and enforcement of this part 3. In conducting institutes and programs, the department may request the assistance of health, education, and fire safety officials.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 766, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-109 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-320. Injunctive proceedings.

The department, in the name of the people of the state of Colorado, through the attorney general of the state, must apply for an injunction in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any person from operating any facility without a license that is required to be licensed under this part 3. If the person does not have a valid license pursuant to this part 3, the person's license has been revoked pursuant to section 26.5-5-317, or the person does not meet the licensing exemption criteria set forth in section 26.5-5-304, yet provides child care, and has a pattern of providing such child care without a valid license as required by this part 3, and despite having received notification from the department that the person or facility is in violation of the law, then the person is providing unlicensed and illegal child care. At the time the department applies for an injunction, the department shall notify law enforcement of the injunction proceedings. If it is established that the defendant has been or is so operating the facility without a valid license, the court shall enter a decree enjoining the defendant from further operating the facility unless and until the person obtains a license to operate the facility. In case of violation of any injunction issued pursuant to this section, the court may summarily try and punish the offender for contempt of court. Such injunctive proceedings are in addition to and not in lieu of the penalty provided in section 26.5-5-321.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 766, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-111 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-321. Penalty - short title.

On or after July 1, 2021, any person violating any provision of this part 3, intentionally making any false statement or report to the department or to any agency delegated by the department to make an investigation or inspection pursuant to the provisions of this part 3, or violating a cease-and-desist order that is not cured commits a petty offense and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of up to five hundred dollars, a sentence of up to ten days in jail, or both.

The short title of this section is the "Elle Matthews Act for Increased Safety in Child Care".

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 766, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-112 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-322. Periodic review of licensing rules and procedures - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds that changes in demographics and economic trends in Colorado have increased the need for high-quality and affordable child care. The general assembly also recognizes that the provision of child care in this state and in the nation is a rapidly growing industry subject to many changes. The general assembly further finds that there is a need for continuing comprehensive review of the rules and the licensing procedures governing child care centers and family child care homes that includes the adequate and full participation of parents, consumers, child care providers, and interested persons. The general assembly finds that such a review with the goal of identifying problems in the fragmentation and lack of uniformity of standards in the licensing process would benefit the state and result in improvements in the regulation of this industry that is so vital to the health and well-being of the state's children and citizens.

By July 1, 2023, and at least every five years thereafter, the department shall conduct a comprehensive review of the licensing rules for child care centers and family child care homes and the procedures relating to and governing child care centers and family child care homes, including procedures for the review of backgrounds of employees and owners. In conducting such periodic review, the department shall consult with parents and consumers of child care, child care providers, the department of public health and environment, the department of human services, experts in the child care field, and other interested parties throughout the state. The periodic review must include an examination of the rules applicable to child care centers and family child care homes, the process of licensing such facilities, uniformity of standards or lack thereof in the licensing process, statewide standardization of investigations and enforcement of licensing by the department, duplication and conflicts in rules, requirements, or procedures between the department and the department of public health and environment, and recommendations for streamlining and unifying the licensing process. The review must also include an examination of rules and procedures regarding the general physical and mental health of employees and owners. At the conclusion of each review, the department shall report its findings and conclusions and its recommendations for administrative changes and for legislation to the executive director of the department of early childhood and the executive director of the department of public health and environment.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 766, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-113 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-323. Civil penalties - fines - child care cash fund - created.

In addition to any other penalty otherwise provided by law, including section 26.5-5-321, any person violating any provision of this part 3 or intentionally making any false statement or report to the department or to any agency delegated by the department to make an investigation or inspection under the provisions of this part 3 may be assessed a civil penalty up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars as follows:

Two hundred fifty dollars a day for the first day;

Five hundred dollars a day for the second day; and

One thousand dollars a day for the third and subsequent days.

Each day in which a person is in violation of any provision of this part 3 may constitute a separate offense.

The department may assess a civil penalty in conformity with the provisions and procedures specified in article 4 of title 24; except that all hearings conducted pursuant to this section must be before an administrative law judge, who shall issue an initial decision. The executive director shall review the initial decision and issue the final decision of the department.

The department shall transmit the fines collected pursuant to this section, section 26.5-5-317 (2) and (7), and section 26.5-5-318 (1)(c) to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the child care cash fund, which fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund all interest derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund remains in the fund and is not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund. Money in the child care cash fund is continuously appropriated to the department to fund activities related to the improvement of the quality of child care in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 767, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-114 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-324. Child care resource and referral system - created.

The department shall design and develop a child care resource and referral system, referred to in this section as the "system", to assist in promoting availability, accessibility, and quality of child care services in Colorado. The executive director, or the executive director's designee, is authorized, within available appropriations, to designate a public or private entity to be responsible for the administration of the system, and may enter into a contract with the administering entity for this purpose. The executive director shall designate or redesignate an administering entity on a biennial basis.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 768, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-116 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-325. Family child care homes - administration of routine medications - parental direction - rules.

The delegation of nursing tasks by a registered nurse pursuant to section 12-255-131 is not required for the administration of routine medications by a child care provider to children cared for in family child care homes licensed pursuant to this part 3, subject to the following conditions:

The parent of the child cared for in the licensed family child care home has daily physical contact with the child care provider that actually administers the routine medication;

The child care provider has successfully completed a medication administration instructional program that is approved by the department;

Routine medications are administered in compliance with rules promulgated by the executive director pursuant to subsection (2) of this section;

If the routine medication involves the administration of unit dose epinephrine, the administration is accompanied by a written protocol by the prescribing health-care professional that identifies the factors for determining the need for the administration of the medication and is limited to emergency situations; and

If the routine medication involves the administration of a nebulized inhaled medication, the administration is accompanied by a written protocol by the prescribing health-care professional that identifies the factors for determining the need for the administration of the medication.

The executive director shall promulgate rules concerning the medically acceptable procedures and standards to be followed by child care providers administering routine medications to children cared for in family child care homes.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 768, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-119 as it existed prior to 2022.